Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3590.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 6.01, is amended to read: 6.01 DUTIES, SEAL. new text begin (a) new text end The state auditor shall superintend and manage the fiscal concerns of the state as required by law. The state auditor may execute in behalf of the state assignments and satisfactions of judgments rendered in its favor. new text begin The state auditor has the authority to investigate fraud and audit state agencies.new text end new text begin (b) new text end The state auditor shall have a seal bearing the words "Seal of the Auditor of Minnesota" and affix it to all official certificates and conveyances executed by the state auditor. new text begin (c) The state auditor shall develop and implement a fraud complaint line for individuals to report suspected fraud to the state auditor. The auditor shall implement an electronic tip form for use by the public. new text end